Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-367
Savings deposit, defined.

Savings deposit shall mean a savings account in an association qualified to accept deposits and on which the association pays interest or dividends, whether at a fixed or indeterminate rate.

Laws 1981, LB 500, § 12.